Missouri, session 2026, HB1884.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 393, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 393.2600, to read as follows:
393.2600. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Light-mitigating technology system", aircraft detection lighting or any
other comparable system capable of reducing the impact of facility obstruction lighting
while maintaining conspicuity sufficient to assist aircraft in identifying and avoiding
collision with a wind energy conversion system;
(2) "Power offtake agreement", a long-term contract that provides for:
(a) The whole or any part of the available capacity or the sale or other disposal
of the whole or any part of the output of a wind energy conversion system; or
(b) A contract for differences or financial hedge ties to the output from the wind
energy conversion system;
(3) "Wind energy conversion system", an electric generation facility consisting
of five or more wind turbines that are fifty feet tall or taller in height and any accessory
structures and buildings, including substations, meteorological towers, electrical
infrastructure, transmission lines, and other appurtenant structures.
2. After August 28, 2026, no new wind energy conversion system shall begin
commercial operations in this state unless the developer, owner, or operator of the wind
energy conversion system applies to the Federal Aviation Administration for installation
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1884 2
of a light-mitigating technology system that complies with 14 CFR 1.1, et seq. If the
installation is approved by the Federal Aviation Administration, the developer, owner,
or operator of such wind energy conversion system shall install the light-mitigating
technology system on approved turbines within twenty-four months of receipt of
approval.
3. Prior to August 28, 2034, any developer, owner, or operator of a wind energy
conversion system that has commenced commercial operations in the state without a
light-mitigating technology system shall apply to the Federal Aviation Administration
for installation and operation of a light-mitigating technology system that complies with
14 CFR 1.1, et seq. If the installation is approved by the Federal Aviation
Administration, the developer, owner, or operator of such wind energy conversion
system shall install the light-mitigating technology system on approved turbines within
twenty-four months of receipt of approval.
4. Any vendor that is selected for installation of a light-mitigating technology
system on a wind energy conversion system under the provisions of this section and is
approved by the Federal Aviation Administration for such installation shall provide to
the Missouri department of natural resources, in the form and manner prescribed by
the department, notice of the progress of the installation of such light-mitigating
technology system.
5. If the installation of the light-mitigating technology system is delayed beyond
the twenty-four-month installation requirement established under this section, the
vendor shall provide notice to the Missouri department of natural resources no less than
once every three months with an update on the reasons for the delay and the current
status of installation. The department shall establish policies and procedures to
establish a uniform schedule for submitting notice as required under this subsection.
6. Any costs associated with the installation, implementation, operation, and
maintenance of a light-mitigating technology system shall be the responsibility of the
developer, owner, or operator of the wind energy conversion system.
7. Any developer, owner, or operator of a wind energy conversion system who is
approved to install light-mitigating technology but does not install such approved light-
mitigating technology in the time frames established in subsections 3 and 5 of this
section shall be liable for a fine of five thousand dollars per day per wind turbine until
the developer, owner, or operator installs the light-mitigating technology as approved.
8. The director may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter

HB 1884 3
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔